Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4403.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3A of chapter 40A of the General Laws, as most recently amended by section 9
of chapter 150 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by adding the following
subsection:-
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (b) or any other general or special law to the contrary, no
department or agency of the commonwealth shall, pursuant to this section or any other general or
special law, withhold funding or grant opportunities for which the MBTA community is
otherwise eligible for failure to comply with this section, if the funding or grant may lawfully be
used by the MBTA community for public safety or public education purposes, as determined by
the department or agency responsible for determining the funding or grant eligibility.
of 1